Texas statutes.
CIVIL PRACTICE AND REMEDIES CODE

TITLE 2. TRIAL, JUDGMENT, AND APPEAL

SUBTITLE B. TRIAL MATTERS

CHAPTER 17. PARTIES; CITATION; LONG-ARM JURISDICTION

SUBCHAPTER A. PARTIES TO SUIT

Sec. 17.001. SUIT ON CONTRACT WITH SEVERAL OBLIGORS OR PARTIES CONDITIONALLY LIABLE. (a) Except as provided by this section, the acceptor of a bill of exchange or a principal obligor on a contract may be sued alone or jointly with another liable party, but a judgment may not be rendered against a party not primarily liable unless judgment is also rendered against the principal obligor.

(b) The assignor, endorser, guarantor, or surety on a contract or the drawer of an accepted bill may be sued without suing the maker, acceptor, or other principal obligor, or a suit against the principal obligor may be discontinued, if the principal obligor:

(1) is a nonresident or resides in a place where he cannot be reached by the ordinary process of law;

(2) resides in a place that is unknown and cannot be ascertained by the use of reasonable diligence;

(3) is dead; or

(4) is actually or notoriously insolvent.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 17.002. SUIT AGAINST ESTATE FOR LAND TITLE. In a suit against the estate of a decedent involving the title to real property, the executor or administrator, if any, and the heirs must be made parties defendant.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 17.003. SUIT AGAINST NONRESIDENT OR TRANSIENT PROPERTY OWNER. For the purpose of establishing title to property, settling a lien or encumbrance on property, or determining an estate, interest, lien, or encumbrance, a person who claims an interest in the property may sue another person who claims an adverse interest or a lien or encumbrance but resides outside this state, resides in an unknown place, or is a transient. The plaintiff is not required to have actual possession of the property.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 17.004. SUIT AGAINST UNKNOWN HEIRS OR UNKNOWN STOCKHOLDERS OF DEFUNCT CORPORATION. A person with a claim against property that has accrued to or been granted to the unknown heirs of a deceased individual or the unknown stockholders of a defunct corporation may sue the heirs or stockholders or their heirs or representatives. The action must describe the defendants as the heirs of the named deceased individual or the unknown stockholders of the named corporation.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 17.005. SUIT AGAINST UNKNOWN LANDOWNER. (a) A person may sue the unknown owner or claimant of an interest in land if:

(1) the person bringing suit claims ownership of an interest in the land or has a claim or cause of action related to the land against the unknown owner or claimant; and

(2) the unknown owner or claimant:

(A) takes or holds the beneficial interest under a conveyance, lease, or written contract that conveyed an interest in the land to a trustee without disclosing the name of the owner of the beneficial interest; or

(B) takes or holds the interest of a dissolved association, joint-stock company, partnership, or other organization under an instrument that did not disclose his name, and the organization had acquired the interest under a conveyance, lease, or written contract that conveyed the interest to the organization in its name without disclosing the names of the members, shareholders, partners, or other persons owning an interest in the organization.

(b) A person may not sue the unknown stockholders of a corporation under this section, but if the plaintiff did not know that the organization was incorporated and the corporate character of the organization was not disclosed in the instrument under which title was acquired, the court retains jurisdiction over the unknown owners even if the organization was in fact incorporated.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

SUBCHAPTER B. CITATION GENERALLY

Sec. 17.021. SERVICE ON CERTAIN NONCORPORATE BUSINESS AGENTS. (a) In an action against an individual, partnership, or unincorporated association that arises in a county in which the individual, partnership, or association has an office, place of business, or agency for transacting business in this state, citation or other civil process may be served on an agent or clerk employed in the office, place of business, or agency if:

(1) the action grows out of or is connected with the business transacted in this state; and

(2) the individual, partnership, or association:

(A) is not a resident of the county;

(B) is not a resident of this state; or

(C) is a resident of the county but has not been found for service of process.

(b) To serve process on an agent or clerk under Subsection (a)(2)(C), the officer making the return of unexecuted process must certify that after diligent search and inquiry the individual, partnership, or association cannot be found and served. The process in the suit may be served on the agent or clerk in any succeeding term of court.

(c) Service of process on an agent or clerk under this section has the effect of personal service on the principal individual, partnership, or unincorporated association and subjects the principal's nonexempt property to the jurisdiction and judgment of the court.

(d) If service is made under this section, a default judgment may not be rendered in the action before the 21st day after the date of service.

(e) Service of process under this section is in addition to other methods of service.

(f) This section does not affect venue.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 17.022. SERVICE ON PARTNERSHIP. Citation served on one member of a partnership authorizes a judgment against the partnership and the partner actually served.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 17.023. SERVICE ON JOINT-STOCK ASSOCIATION. (a) In an action against a joint-stock association, citation may be served by:

(1) serving the president, vice-president, secretary, cashier, assistant cashier, or treasurer of the association;

(2) serving the local agent of the association in the county in which the suit is brought; or

(3) leaving a copy of the citation at the principal office of the association during office hours.

(b) If no officer on whom citation may be served resides in the county in which suit is brought and the association has no agent in that county, citation may be served on any agent representing the association in this state.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 288, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1987.

Sec. 17.024. SERVICE ON POLITICAL SUBDIVISION. (a) In a suit against a county, citation must be served on the county judge.

(b) In a suit against an incorporated city, town, or village, citation may be served on the mayor, clerk, secretary, or treasurer.

(c) In a suit against a school district, citation may be served on the president of the school board or on the superintendent.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 17.025. ASSESSMENT OF POSTAGE COST FOR MAIL SERVICE. (a) If a public official is required or permitted by law to serve legal process by mail, including process in a suit for delinquent taxes, the official may:

(1) collect advance payment for the actual cost of the postage required to serve or deliver the process; or

(2) assess the expense of postage as costs.

(b) Charges under this section are in addition to other charges allowed by law for services performed by the official serving the process.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 17.026. SERVICE ON SECRETARY OF STATE. (a) In an action in which citation may be served on the secretary of state, service may be made by certified mail, return receipt requested, by the clerk of the court in which the case is pending or by the party or the representative of the party.

(b) The method of service of citation provided by this section is in addition to any other method authorized by statute or the Texas Rules of Civil Procedure for service on the secretary of state.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 954, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 17.027. PREPARATION AND SERVICE. (a) The plaintiff or his attorney may prepare the appropriate citation for the defendant.

(b) The citation must be in the form prescribed by the Texas Rules of Civil Procedure.

(c) The citation shall be served in the manner prescribed by law.

(d) The plaintiff or his attorney shall comply with the applicable Texas Rules of Civil Procedure governing preparation and issuance of citation.

(e) Repealed by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 976, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 663, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 976, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 17.028. SERVICE ON FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS. (a) In this section, "financial institution" has the meaning assigned by Section 201.101, Finance Code.

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (c), citation may be served on a financial institution by:

(1) serving the registered agent of the financial institution; or

(2) if the financial institution does not have a registered agent, serving the president or a branch manager at any office located in this state.

(c) Citation may be served on a credit union by:

(1) serving the registered agent of the credit union; or

(2) if the credit union does not have a registered agent, serving the president or vice president.

(d) If citation has not been properly served as provided by this section, a financial institution may maintain an action to set aside the default judgment or any sanctions entered against the financial institution.

(e) A citation served on a credit union that is located in a place of worship may not be served during a worship service.

(f) Service on and delivery to a financial institution of claims against a customer of the financial institution are governed by Section 59.008, Finance Code.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 244 (H.B. 2219), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 5 (S.B. 422), Sec. 1, eff. May 2, 2013.

Sec. 17.029. SERVICE ON INMATE OF TEXAS DEPARTMENT OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE. (a) In this section, "inmate" means a person confined in a facility operated by or under contract with the Texas Department of Criminal Justice.

(b) In a civil action against an inmate, citation or other civil process may be served on the inmate by serving a person designated under Subsection (c) as an agent for service of civil process.

(c) The warden of each facility operated by or under contract with the Texas Department of Criminal Justice shall designate an employee at the facility to serve as an agent for service of civil process on inmates confined in the facility.

(d) An employee designated under Subsection (c) as an agent for service of civil process shall promptly deliver any civil process served on the employee to the appropriate inmate.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 267 (H.B. 1381), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 17.030. RETURN OF SERVICE. (a) The supreme court shall adopt rules of civil procedure requiring a person who serves process to complete a return of service.

(b) The rules:

(1) must provide that the return of service:

(A) is not required to be endorsed or attached to the original process issued; and

(B) may be electronically filed; and

(2) may require that the following information be included in the return of service:

(A) the cause number and case name;

(B) the court in which the case has been filed;

(C) the date and time process was received for service;

(D) the person or entity served;

(E) the address served;

(F) the date of service;

(G) the manner of delivery of service;

(H) a description of process served;

(I) the name of the person serving process; and

(J) if the process server is certified as a process server by the supreme court, the process server's identification number.

(c) A person certified by the supreme court as a process server or a person authorized outside of Texas to serve process shall sign the return of service under penalty of perjury. The return of service is not required to be verified.

(d) A person who knowingly or intentionally falsifies a return of service may be prosecuted for tampering with a governmental record as provided by Chapter 37, Penal Code.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 245 (H.B. 962), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 17.031. EXPEDITED FORECLOSURE PROCEEDINGS. For a power of sale exercised by the filing of an application for an expedited court order allowing the foreclosure of a contract lien under the Texas Rules of Civil Procedure 736, service of citation shall be completed in accordance with Rule 736 or 106, Texas Rules of Civil Procedure, or in any other manner provided for petitions under the Texas Rules of Civil Procedure.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1044 (H.B. 2978), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 17.032. CITATION BY PUBLICATION. (a) Notwithstanding any statute or rule requiring a person to publish citation or notice on the public information Internet website maintained as required by Section 72.034, Government Code, and in a newspaper of general circulation, the person may publish the citation or notice only on the public information Internet website if:

(1) the person files a statement of inability to afford payment of court costs under the Texas Rules of Civil Procedure;

(2) the total cost of the required publication exceeds the greater of $200 each week or the amount set by the supreme court under Subsection (b); or

(3) the county in which the publication of the citation or notice is required does not have any newspaper published, printed, or generally circulated in the county.

(b) The supreme court shall adjust for inflation the maximum amount of publication costs established in Subsection (a)(2).

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 606 (S.B. 891), Sec. 10.03, eff. June 1, 2020.

Sec. 17.033. SUBSTITUTED SERVICE THROUGH SOCIAL MEDIA PRESENCE. (a) If substituted service of citation is authorized under the Texas Rules of Civil Procedure, the court, in accordance with the rules adopted by the supreme court under Subsection (b), may prescribe as a method of service an electronic communication sent to the defendant through a social media presence.

(b) The supreme court shall adopt rules to provide for the substituted service of citation by an electronic communication sent to a defendant through a social media presence.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 606 (S.B. 891), Sec. 10.04(a), eff. June 1, 2020.

SUBCHAPTER C. LONG-ARM JURISDICTION IN SUIT ON BUSINESS TRANSACTION OR TORT

Sec. 17.041. DEFINITION. In this subchapter, "nonresident" includes:

(1) an individual who is not a resident of this state; and

(2) a foreign corporation, joint-stock company, association, or partnership.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 17.042. ACTS CONSTITUTING BUSINESS IN THIS STATE. In addition to other acts that may constitute doing business, a nonresident does business in this state if the nonresident:

(1) contracts by mail or otherwise with a Texas resident and either party is to perform the contract in whole or in part in this state;

(2) commits a tort in whole or in part in this state; or

(3) recruits Texas residents, directly or through an intermediary located in this state, for employment inside or outside this state.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 17.043. SERVICE ON PERSON IN CHARGE OF BUSINESS. In an action arising from a nonresident's business in this state, process may be served on the person in charge, at the time of service, of any business in which the nonresident is engaged in this state if the nonresident is not required by statute to designate or maintain a resident agent for service of process.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 17.044. SUBSTITUTED SERVICE ON SECRETARY OF STATE. (a) The secretary of state is an agent for service of process or complaint on a nonresident who:

(1) is required by statute to designate or maintain a resident agent or engages in business in this state, but has not designated or maintained a resident agent for service of process;

(2) has one or more resident agents for service of process, but two unsuccessful attempts have been made on different business days to serve each agent; or

(3) is not required to designate an agent for service in this state, but becomes a nonresident after a cause of action arises in this state but before the cause is matured by suit in a court of competent jurisdiction.

(b) The secretary of state is an agent for service of process on a nonresident who engages in business in this state, but does not maintain a regular place of business in this state or a designated agent for service of process, in any proceeding that arises out of the business done in this state and to which the nonresident is a party.

(c) After the death of a nonresident for whom the secretary of state is an agent for service of process under this section, the secretary of state is an agent for service of process on a nonresident administrator, executor, or personal representative of the nonresident. If an administrator, executor, or personal representative for the estate of the deceased nonresident is not appointed, the secretary of state is an agent for service of process on an heir, as determined by the law of the foreign jurisdiction, of the deceased nonresident.

(d) If a nonresident for whom the secretary of state is an agent for service of process under this section is judged incompetent by a court of competent jurisdiction, the secretary of state is an agent for service of process on a guardian or personal representative of the nonresident.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 158, Sec. 1, eff. May 25, 1987.

Sec. 17.045. NOTICE TO NONRESIDENT. (a) If the secretary of state is served with duplicate copies of process for a nonresident, the documents shall contain a statement of the name and address of the nonresident's home or home office and the secretary of state shall immediately mail a copy of the process to the nonresident at the address provided.

(b) If the secretary of state is served with process under Section 17.044(a)(3), he shall immediately mail a copy of the process to the nonresident (if an individual), to the person in charge of the nonresident's business, or to a corporate officer (if the nonresident is a corporation).

(c) If the person in charge of a nonresident's business is served with process under Section 17.043, a copy of the process and notice of the service must be immediately mailed to the nonresident or the nonresident's principal place of business.

(d) The process or notice must be sent by registered mail or by certified mail, return receipt requested.

(e) If the secretary of state is served with duplicate copies of process as an agent for a person who is a nonresident administrator, executor, heir, guardian, or personal representative of a nonresident, the secretary shall require a statement of the person's name and address and shall immediately mail a copy of the process to the person.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 158, Sec. 2, eff. May 25, 1987; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 275, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

SUBCHAPTER D. LONG-ARM JURISDICTION OVER NONRESIDENT MOTOR VEHICLE OPERATOR

Sec. 17.061. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Agent" includes a servant, employee, heir, legal representative, executor, administrator, or guardian.

(2) "Chairman" means the chairman of the Texas Transportation Commission.

(3) "Motor vehicle" includes a motorcycle.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 22(23), eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 17.062. SUBSTITUTED SERVICE ON CHAIRMAN OF TEXAS TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION. (a) The chairman of the Texas Transportation Commission is an agent for service of process on a person who is a nonresident or an agent of a nonresident in any suit against the person or agent that grows out of a collision in which the person or the person's agent is involved while operating a motor vehicle in this state.

(b) Process may be served on the chairman in accordance with this section for a nonresident who was a resident at the time the cause of action accrued but has subsequently moved from the state.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 22(24), eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 709 (H.B. 2190), Sec. 112, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 17.063. METHOD OF SERVICE; NOTICE TO NONRESIDENT. (a) A certified copy of the process must be served on the chairman not later than the 20th day prior to the date of return stated in the process.

(b) Immediately after being served, the chairman by properly addressed letter shall mail to the nonresident or agent:

(1) a copy of the process; and

(2) notice that the process has been served on the chairman.

(c) The notice and copy of the process must be sent to the nonresident or agent by registered mail, or by certified mail, return receipt requested, with the postage prepaid.

(d) After the chairman deposits the copy of the process in the mail, it is presumed that the process was transmitted by the chairman and received by the nonresident or agent. The presumption may be rebutted.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 17.064. SAME EFFECT AS PERSONAL SERVICE. Service on the chairman has the same effect as personal service on the nonresident.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 17.065. FAILED SUBSTITUTED SERVICE. (a) If the notice of service on the chairman cannot be effected by registered or certified mail or if the nonresident or agent refuses to accept delivery of the notice, the plaintiff may have the defendant personally served with a certified copy of the process and a notice stating that the chairman has been served and the date on which he was served.

(b) The return of service under this section must:

(1) state when it was served;

(2) state on whom it was served; and

(3) be signed under penalty of perjury by the party making the service.

(c) The process and notice may be served by any disinterested person competent to make an oath that the process and notice were served.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 245 (H.B. 962), Sec. 2, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 17.066. RETURN. An officer who serves process on the chairman under this subchapter shall state on his return the day and hour of service and any other facts required generally for returns of service of citation.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 17.067. DEFAULT JUDGMENT. If process is served on the chairman under this subchapter, a court may not grant default judgment against the defendant before the 21st day after the day on which the chairman was served.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 17.068. CONTINUANCE OR POSTPONEMENT. A court may continue or postpone an action in which process is served under this subchapter as necessary to afford the defendant reasonable opportunity to defend.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 17.069. CHAIRMAN'S CERTIFICATE. (a) On request of any party and payment of a $25 fee, the chairman shall certify the occurrence or performance of any duty, act, omission, transaction, or happening contemplated or required by this subchapter, including the wording of any registered letter received.

(b) The chairman may make the certification to the court that issued the process or to another court in which an action is pending against the nonresident or agent.

(c) The chairman's certificate and the certified wording of a registered letter are prima facie evidence of the statements contained in the certificate or letter.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

SUBCHAPTER E. CITATION OF NONRESIDENTS--MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

Sec. 17.091. SUBSTITUTED SERVICE IN DELINQUENT TAX CASES. (a) In a suit to collect delinquent property taxes by the state or a political subdivision of the state in which a defendant in the suit is a nonresident, the secretary of state is an agent for service of process on that defendant if the defendant owns, has, or claims an interest in or a lien against property in this state that is the subject of the suit. This section applies regardless of whether the defendant has resided in this state.

(b) Duplicate copies of the process issued by the clerk of the court in which the suit is pending must be served on the secretary of state not later than the 20th day before the date of return stated in the process. The process must include the name and address of the nonresident's home or home office. The address may be a post office box.

(c) Immediately after being served, the secretary of state shall mail a copy of the process to the nonresident at the address provided under Subsection (b) by certified mail, return receipt requested, with the postage prepaid. The secretary of state shall certify to the court that issued the process that the secretary of state has complied with this section.

(d) Service under this section is in addition to procedures provided by Rule 117a of the Texas Rules of Civil Procedure and has the same effect as personal service.

(e) Service of process on the secretary of state under this section must be accompanied by the fee provided by Section 405.031(a), Government Code, for the maintenance by the secretary of state of a record of the service of process.

(f) In this section, "nonresident" includes:

(1) an individual who is not a resident of this state; and

(2) a foreign corporation, foreign unincorporated association, foreign general partnership, foreign limited partnership, foreign limited liability company, foreign professional association, foreign business trust, foreign cooperative, or foreign real estate investment trust that is not required to appoint a registered agent for service of process in this state under the provisions of the Business Organizations Code.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 384, Sec. 14, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 2nd C.S., ch. 6, Sec. 60, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 579, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1996; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 948, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1430, Sec. 34, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1126 (H.B. 2491), Sec. 28, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 182 (H.B. 1804), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 7 (S.B. 582), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 17.092. SERVICE ON NONRESIDENT UTILITY SUPPLIER. A nonresident individual or partnership that supplies gas, water, electricity, or other public utility service to a city, town, or village in this state may be served citation by serving the local agent, representative, superintendent, or person in charge of the nonresident's business.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 17.093. SERVICE ON FOREIGN RAILWAY. In addition to other methods of service provided by law, process may be served on a foreign railway by serving:

(1) a train conductor who:

(A) handles trains for two or more railway corporations, at least one of which is the foreign corporation and at least one of which is a domestic corporation; and

(B) handles trains for the railway corporations over tracks that cross the state's boundary and on tracks of a domestic corporation within this state; or

(2) an agent who:

(A) has an office in this state; and

(B) sells tickets or makes contracts for the transportation of passengers or property over all or part of the line of the foreign railway.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 959, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.